Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 General Provisions
63-1-161. Waiver of initial licensure fees for low-income persons.

As used in this section:

“Licensing” means the procedure through which the privilege to engage in a specific profession regulated under this title is granted by a licensing authority;

“Licensing authority” means any state agency with the authority to impose training, education, or licensure fees to practice in a profession;

“Licensure fee” means a fee imposed by a licensing authority on persons licensed to practice a profession for the privilege of providing goods or services;

“Low-income persons” means persons who are enrolled in a state or federal public assistance program, including, but not limited to, temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), medicaid, or supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP); and

“State agency” means a state board, agency, or commission attached to the division of health related boards, as listed in § 68-1-101(a)(8).

Any licensing authority that requires a license for persons to practice in a profession shall waive all initial licensure fees for low-income persons.

Persons seeking a waiver of initial licensure fee requirements shall apply to the appropriate licensing authority in a format prescribed by the authority.

All licensing authorities to which this section applies shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this section. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2018, ch. 954, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 954, § 4. January 1, 2019; provided, that for purposes, of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 18, 2018.

63-1-162. Task force to create minimum disciplinary action for healthcare practitioner who deviates from sound medical judgment in treatment of patient with an opioid. [Effective until July 1, 2023.]

If a healthcare practitioner treats a human patient with an opioid and that healthcare practitioner's licensing board or agency finds that the healthcare practitioner engaged in a significant deviation or pattern of deviation from sound medical judgment, the minimum disciplinary action that a healthcare practitioner's licensing board or committee must take shall be established and promulgated by rule by a task force composed of representatives from:

The board of medical examiners;

The board of osteopathic examination;

The board of dentistry;

The board of podiatric medical examiners;

The board of optometry;

The board of nursing; and

The board of medical examiners' committee on physician assistants.

The task force must create a uniform minimum disciplinary action pursuant to this section, which shall be binding on each board and committee listed in subsection (a).

The task force is authorized to establish minimum disciplinary actions pursuant to this section by emergency rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The rule promulgated by the task force shall be codified and published by the secretary of state in each of the chapters for the boards and committee listed in subsection (a).

Each board and committee listed in subsection (a) must select and appoint by majority vote one (1) member of their respective board or committee to serve on the task force before September 1, 2018.

The task force shall select and appoint a member to serve as chair of the task force.

A majority of the task force shall constitute a quorum, and a majority vote of the task force members present is required for any action.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act to the contrary, the task force shall hear public comment at any required hearing on behalf of all boards listed in subsection (a) when a hearing is required. The task force is authorized to vote to promulgate the rule to establish the uniform minimum disciplinary action for each board and committee listed in subsection (a).

In the event that the task force has not promulgated uniform minimum disciplinary actions by April 1, 2019, then the minimum disciplinary action that a healthcare practitioner's licensing board or agency must take is a removal of the healthcare practitioner's right to prescribe controlled substances for no less than five (5) years.

The task force shall terminate upon the later of July 1, 2019, or the effective date of a permanent rule establishing the uniform minimum disciplinary action pursuant to this section. The procedures of this section must be followed to amend, repeal, or otherwise revise the uniform minimum disciplinary action established pursuant to this section. In such case, the task force may be reconvened by the commissioner of health or a majority of the boards and committees listed in subsection (a).

Nothing in this part shall be construed to prohibit the licensing boards and committee listed in subsection (a) from promulgating rules regarding other minimum disciplinary actions that will be taken against their licensees.

Acts 2018, ch. 978, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 978, § 14 provided that this section shall terminate on July 1, 2023 and law in effect prior to this act shall be restored.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 978, § 15. July 1, 2018; provided, that for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

63-1-163. Partial fill for prescription for controlled substance — Partial fill for opioid.

As used in this section:

“Original prescription” means a prescription for a controlled substance from an authorized prescriber that is presented by the patient to the pharmacist or submitted electronically to the pharmacy; and

“Partial fill” means a prescription filled in a lesser quantity than the amount specified on the prescription for the patient.

A prescription for a controlled substance may be partially filled if:

The partial fill is requested by the patient or the practitioner who wrote the prescription; and

The total quantity dispensed through partial fills pursuant to subdivision (b)(1)(A) does not exceed the total quantity prescribed for the original prescription.

If a partial fill is made, the pharmacist shall retain the original prescription at the pharmacy where the prescription was first presented and the partial fill dispensed.

Any subsequent fill must occur at the pharmacy that initially dispensed the partial fill. Any subsequent fill must be filled within six (6) months from issuance of the original prescription, unless federal law requires it to be filled within a shorter timeframe.

If a partial fill is dispensed, the pharmacist shall only record in the controlled substance database the partial fill amount actually dispensed.

If a partial fill is dispensed, the pharmacist shall notify the prescribing practitioner of the partial fill and of the amount actually dispensed:

Through a notation in the interoperable electronic health record of the patient;

Through submission of information to the controlled substance database;

By electronic or facsimile transmission; or

Through a notation in the patient's record that is maintained by the pharmacy, and that is accessible to the practitioner upon request.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to conflict with or supersede any other requirement established in this part or title 53, chapter 10 or 11, for a prescription of a controlled substance.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

A pharmacist or pharmacy is authorized to charge a dispensing fee to cover the actual supply and labor costs associated with the dispensing of the original prescription of an opioid and each partial fill associated with the original prescription.

Any cost sharing, copayment, dispensing fee, or any portion thereof, made to a pharmacist or pharmacy for the dispensing of a partial fill of an opioid shall not be considered an overpayment.

A health insurance issuer or pharmacy benefits manager shall not utilize partial fills of an opioid to reduce payments to a pharmacist or pharmacy for dispensing multiple partial fills.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

A pharmacist or pharmacy is authorized to charge a dispensing fee to cover the actual supply and labor costs associated with the dispensing of the original prescription of a controlled substance other than an opioid and each partial fill associated with the original prescription.

Any cost sharing, copayment, dispensing fee, or any portion thereof, made to a pharmacist or pharmacy for the dispensing of a partial fill of a controlled substance other than an opioid shall not be considered an overpayment.

A health insurance issuer or pharmacy benefits manager shall not utilize partial fills of a controlled substance other than an opioid to reduce payments to a pharmacist or pharmacy for dispensing multiple partial fills.

By January 1, 2021, all pharmacy dispensing software vendors operating in this state shall update their dispensing software systems to allow for partial filling of controlled substances pursuant to this section.

Acts 2018, ch. 1007, § 1; 2019, ch. 124, §§ 5, 6, 14, 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1007, § 2 provided that subsection (d) of this section shall take effect January 1, 2019, and, as amended by Acts 2019, ch. 124, § 15, that subsection (e) of this section shall take effect July 1, 2019.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (b)(3), substituted both occurrences of “must” for “shall”, substituted “six (6) months” for thirty (30) days”, and added “, unless federal law requires it to be filled within a shorter timeframe” at the end; deleted former (d)(1) which read: “A person who presents a prescription for a partial fill for an opioid pursuant to this section is required to pay the prorated portion of cost sharing and copayments.”; deleted former (e)(1) (which never took effect); and added (f). See Compiler’s Notes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1007, § 2. May 1, 2019; January 1, 2019; July 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 124, § 16. April 9, 2019.

63-1-164. Restrictions and limitations on treating patient with opioids. [Effective until July 1, 2023.]

As used in this section:

“Alternative treatments” includes, but is not limited to, treatments such as chiropractic care, physical therapy, nonopioid medicinal drugs or drug products, occupational therapy, acupuncture, interventional procedures or treatments, and other such treatments that relieve pain without the use of opioids;

“Encounter” means a single visit where an opioid is administered or an opioid prescription is issued or dispensed;

“Healthcare practitioner” means a person licensed under this title who has the authority to prescribe or dispense controlled substances in the course of professional practice;

“ICD-10 code” means the code established in the International Classification of Diseases, Tenth Revision, Clinical Modification (ICD-10-CM) adopted by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, or the code used in any successor classification system adopted by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, that corresponds to the diagnosis of the condition being treated;

“Informed consent” means consent voluntarily given in writing by the patient or the patient's legal representative after sufficient explanation and disclosure by the healthcare practitioner of the subject matter involved to enable the person whose consent is sought to make a knowing and willful decision. This explanation and disclosure by the healthcare practitioner to the patient or the patient's legal representative before consent may be obtained must include, at a minimum:

Adequate information to allow the patient or the patient's legal representative to understand:

The risks, effects, and characteristics of opioids, including the risks of physical dependency and addiction, misuse, and diversion;

What to expect when taking an opioid and how opioids should be used; and

Reasonable alternatives to opioids for treating or managing the patient's condition or symptoms and the benefits and risks of the alternative treatments;

A reasonable opportunity for questions by the patient or patient's legal representative;

Discussion and consideration by the patient or the patient's legal representative and the healthcare practitioner of whether the patient should take an opioid medication; and

If the patient is a woman of childbearing age and ability, information regarding neonatal abstinence syndrome and specific information regarding how to access contraceptive services in the community. For purposes of this section, childbearing age is between the ages of fifteen (15) and forty-four (44);

Nothing in subdivision (a)(5)(A) limits other requirements imposed on healthcare practitioners by law or applicable licensing authority;

“Morphine milligram equivalent dose” means the morphine milligram equivalent calculation for the amount of a prescribed opioid, multiplied by the days of treatment;

“Palliative care” means specialized treatment for patients facing serious illness, which focuses on providing relief of suffering through a multidisciplinary approach in order to maximize quality of life for the patient. As used in this subdivision (a)(7), “serious illness” means a health condition that carries a high risk of mortality and negatively impacts a patient's daily bodily functions; and

“Treat” means prescribe, dispense, or administer.

Except as provided in this section, a healthcare practitioner shall not treat a patient with more than a three-day supply of an opioid and shall not treat a patient with an opioid dosage that exceeds a total of one hundred eighty (180) morphine milligram equivalent dose. A healthcare practitioner shall not be required to include an ICD-10 code on any prescription for an opioid of a three-day supply or less and an opioid dosage of less than one hundred eighty (180) morphine milligram equivalent.

A patient shall not be treated with an opioid more frequently than every ten (10) days; provided, however, that if the patient has an adverse reaction to an opioid, a healthcare practitioner may treat a patient with a different opioid within a ten-day period under the following circumstances:

The healthcare practitioner is employed by the same practice that initially treated the patient with the opioid that caused the adverse reaction;

The healthcare practitioner personally evaluates the patient, assesses the patient's adverse reaction, and determines a different course of treatment is more medically appropriate;

The healthcare practitioner confirms with the dispenser that the remainder of the initial prescription has been cancelled by the dispenser;

The healthcare practitioner counsels the patient to appropriately destroy any remaining opioids that were previously dispensed to the patient; and

The healthcare practitioner's treatment of the patient conforms to the requirements of this section.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1), where the treatment provided by a healthcare practitioner is prescribing an opioid, the healthcare practitioner may authorize the prescription to be dispensed by partial fill by placing “partial fill” or “PF” on the prescription.

A healthcare practitioner may treat a patient with more than a three-day supply of an opioid if the healthcare practitioner treats the patient with no more than one (1) prescription for an opioid per encounter and:

Personally conducts a thorough evaluation of the patient;

Documents consideration of non-opioid and non-pharmacologic pain management strategies and why the strategies failed or were not attempted;

Includes the ICD-10 code for the primary disease in the patient's chart, and on the prescription when a prescription is issued; and

Obtains informed consent and documents the reason for treating with an opioid in the chart.

A healthcare practitioner who is dispensing pursuant to a prescription written by another healthcare practitioner for more than a three-day supply of an opioid is not required to satisfy subdivisions (d)(1)(A)(i)-(iv) when filling a prescription that contains an ICD-10 code; provided, that the healthcare practitioner shall not dispense more than one (1) prescription for an opioid to a patient per encounter.

If a healthcare practitioner treats a patient with more than a three-day supply of an opioid, the healthcare practitioner may treat the patient with no more than a ten-day supply and with a dosage that does not exceed a total of a five hundred (500) morphine milligram equivalent dose.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(2), in rare cases where the patient has a condition that will be treated by a procedure that is more than minimally invasive and sound medical judgment would determine the risk of adverse effects from the pain exceeds the risk of the development of a substance use disorder or overdose event, a healthcare practitioner may treat a patient with up to a thirty-day supply of an opioid and with a dosage that does not exceed a total of a twelve hundred (1200) morphine milligram equivalent dose.

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(2), in rare cases after trial and failure of reasonable, appropriate, and available non-opioid treatments for the pain condition or documenting the contraindication, inefficacy, or intolerance of non-opioid treatments, where medical necessity and sound medical judgment would determine the risk of adverse effects from the pain exceeds the risk of the development of a substance use disorder or overdose event, a healthcare practitioner may treat a patient with up to a thirty-day supply of an opioid and with a dosage that does not exceed a total of a one thousand two hundred (1,200) morphine milligram equivalent dose. The healthcare practitioner must include the phrase “medical necessity” on the prescription for any prescription issued pursuant to this subdivision (d)(4).

The restrictions of this section do not apply to the following; provided, that where a prescription is issued pursuant to this subsection (e), the prescription contains the ICD-10 code for the primary disease documented in the patient's chart and the word “exempt”:

The treatment of patients who are undergoing active cancer treatment, undergoing palliative care treatment, or are receiving hospice care;

The treatment of patients with a diagnosis of sickle cell disease;

The administration of opioids directly to a patient during the patient's treatment at any facility licensed under title 68, chapter 11, or any hospital licensed under title 33, chapter 2, part 4;

Prescriptions issued by healthcare practitioners who are:

Pain management specialists, as that term is defined in § 63-1-301, or who are collaborating with a pain management specialist in accordance with § 63-1-306(a)(3); provided, that the patient receiving the prescription is personally assessed by the pain management specialist, or by the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant collaborating with the pain management specialist; or

Treating patients in an outpatient setting of a hospital exempt under § 63-1-302(2) that holds itself out to the public as a pain management clinic.

The treatment of patients who have been treated with an opioid daily for ninety (90) days or more during the three hundred sixty-five (365) days prior to April 15, 2018, or those who are subsequently treated for ninety (90) days or more under one (1) of the exceptions listed in subdivision (d)(4) or this subsection (e);

The direct administration of, or dispensing of, methadone for the treatment of an opioid use disorder to a patient who is receiving treatment from a healthcare practitioner practicing under 21 U.S.C. § 823(g)(1);

The treatment of a patient for opioid use disorder with products that are approved by the U.S. food and drug administration for opioid use disorder by a healthcare practitioner under 21 U.S.C. § 823(g)(2);

The treatment of a patient with a product that is an opioid antagonist and does not contain an opioid agonist; or

The treatment of a patient who has suffered a severe burn or major physical trauma and for whom sound medical judgment would determine the risk of adverse effects from the pain exceeds the risk of the development of a substance use disorder or overdose event. As used in this subdivision (e)(9), “severe burn” means an injury sustained from thermal or chemical causes resulting in second degree or third degree burns. As used in this subdivision (e)(9), “major physical trauma” means a serious injury sustained due to blunt or penetrating force which results in serious blood loss, fracture, significant temporary or permanent impairment, or disability.

The commissioner of health, in consultation with the regulatory boards created pursuant to this title that license healthcare practitioners, shall study and analyze the impact and effects of the restrictions and limitations set forth in this section. No later than November 1, 2021, the commissioner shall issue a report relative to the impact and effects of the restrictions and limitations to the governor, the health and welfare committee of the senate, and the health committee of the house of representatives. The report may include recommendations for revisions to the restrictions on the prescription of opioids.

This section applies only to the treatment of human patients.

This section does not apply to opioids approved by the food and drug administration to treat upper respiratory symptoms or cough. However, a healthcare practitioner shall not treat a patient with more than a fourteen-day supply of such an opioid.

Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 6; 2019, ch. 117, § 1; 2019, ch. 124, §§ 7-13; 2020, ch. 573, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 9 provided that sections 1 and 6 of the act, which enacted this section and amended § 53-10-303, shall terminate on July 1, 2023, and the law in effect prior to July 1, 2018 shall be restored.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by ch. 117 added the definition of “alternative treatments” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 124, effective April 9, 2019, added the definition of “palliative care” in (a); rewrote (c)(2) which read: “(2) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1), where the treatment provided by a healthcare practitioner is dispensing an opioid, the healthcare practitioner may treat a patient more than once within ten (10) days; provided, that the healthcare practitioner shall not dispense an opioid in an amount that exceeds the greater of:“(i) A five-day supply per encounter; or“(ii) Half of the total prescribed amount.“(B) The healthcare practitioner may dispense the remainder in a subsequent encounter.“(C) The partial fill requirements of this subdivision (c)(2) shall not be mandatory prior to January 1, 2019, for a dispenser who has not updated the dispenser's software system.”; substituted “thirty-day supply of an opioid and with a dosage that does not exceed a total of a twelve hundred (1200) morphine milligram equivalent dose” for “twenty-day supply of an opioid and with a dosage that does not exceed a total of an eight hundred fifty (850) morphine milligram equivalent dose” at the end of (d)(3); rewrote (e)(1) which read: “The treatment of patients who are undergoing active or palliative cancer treatment or who are receiving hospice care;”; in (e)(9), substituted “for whom sound medical judgment” for “, as those terms are defined by the controlled substance database committee by rule and adopted by the licensing boards created pursuant to title 63, and sound medical judgment” in the first sentence and added the last two sentences; and added (h); and, effective July 1, 2019, added the last sentence in (b).

The 2020 amendment substituted “nonopioid medicinal drugs or drug products, occupational therapy, acupuncture, interventional procedures or treatments, and other such treatments” for “acupuncture, and other such treatments” in the definition of “alternative treatments”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 10. July 1, 2018; provided that for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 117, § 2. April 9, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 124, § 16. April 9, 2019; July 1, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 573, § 2. March 19, 2020.

63-1-165.
[Repealed.]

Acts 2018, ch. 1054, § 1; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 222, § 1, effective April 30, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-1-165 concerned requirements for person practicing ultrasound sonography in nonclinical 3D/4D ultrasound boutique setting.

63-1-166. Acceptance of barter as payment for healthcare services.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a healthcare professional may accept goods or services as payment in a direct exchange of barter for healthcare services provided by the healthcare professional if the patient to whom the healthcare services are provided is not covered by health insurance coverage, as defined by § 56-7-109. A healthcare professional who accepts barter as payment in accordance with this section shall annually submit a copy of the relevant federal tax form disclosing the healthcare professional's income from barter to the healthcare professional's licensing board. This section does not apply to any healthcare services provided at a pain management clinic as defined in § 63-1-301.

For purposes of this section, “healthcare professional” means a physician or other healthcare practitioner licensed, registered, accredited, or certified to perform specified healthcare services pursuant to this title or title 68 and regulated under the authority of the department of health or any agency, board, council, or committee attached to the department.

Acts 2019, ch. 229, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 229, § 3. April 30, 2019.

63-1-167. Exemption from licensing requirements for medical professionals participating in federal lnnovative Readiness Training programs.

Notwithstanding any requirement for the licensure of a medical professional by a health related board listed in § 68-1-101, a medical professional who has a current license to practice from another state, commonwealth, territory, or the District of Columbia is exempt from the licensure requirements of such boards, if:

The medical professional is an active or reserve member of the armed forces of the United States, a member of the national guard, a civilian employee of the United States department of defense, an authorized personal services contractor under 10 U.S.C. § 1091, or a healthcare professional otherwise authorized by the department of defense; and

The medical professional is engaged in the practice of a medical profession listed in § 68-1-101 through a program in partnership with the federal Innovative Readiness Training.

The exemption provided by this section only applies while:

The medical professional's practice is required by the program pursuant to military orders; and

The services provided by the medical professional are within the scope of practice for the individual's respective profession in this state.

This section does not permit a medical professional exempt by this section to engage in the practice of a medical profession listed in § 68-1-101, except as part of federal Innovative Readiness Training as described in this section.

The respective health related board may promulgate rules to effectuate this section. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2019, ch. 255, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The federal Innovative Readiness Training, referred to in this section, is codified at 10 U.S.C. § 2012.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 255, § 2. July 1, 2019; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect April 30, 2019.